Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6555
Applications; deadline.

Applications under the Grow the Good Life Act may be filed beginning January 1, 2027, through May 31, 2029. All applications and all agreements pending, approved, or entered into on or before May 31, 2029, shall continue in full force and effect.

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 12.
April 17, 2026